test/src/gt-norm-yamls/old-yamls/N-IN-oskasakay_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - oskasâkay - ok : # -m inanimate noun, new coat, Wolvengrey
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Sg: oskasâkay
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitoskasâkay
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitoskasâkay
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitoskasâkânân
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitoskasâkânaw
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitoskasâkâwâw
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: otoskasâkay
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: otoskasâkâwâw
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: otoskasâkâyiw
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Pl: oskasâkaya
     
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitoskasâkaya
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitoskasâkaya
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitoskasâkânâna
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitoskasâkânawa
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitoskasâkâwâwa
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: otoskasâkaya
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: otoskasâkâwâwa
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: otoskasâkâyiwa
     
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Loc: oskasâkâhk
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitoskasâkâhk
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitoskasâkâhk
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitoskasâkânâhk
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitoskasâkânâhk
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitoskasâkâwâhk
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: otoskasâkâhk
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: otoskasâkâwâhk
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: otoskasâkâyihk
     
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: [oskasâkâs, oskasâkâsis]
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: [oskasâkâsa, oskasâkâsisa]
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: [oskasâkâsihk, oskasâkâsisihk]
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: [nicoskasâkâs, nicoskasâkâsis]
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: [kicoskasâkâs, kicoskasâkâsis]
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: [ocoskasâkâs, ocoskasâkâsis]
     oskasâkay+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: [ocoskasâkâsiyiw, ocoskasâkâsisiyiw]
